Illinois, session 104th, HB3476.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 355.5 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/355.5)7    Sec. 355.5. Dental coverage reimbursement; prohibitions. 8No insurer, dental service plan corporation, professional 9service corporation, insurance network leasing company, or any 10company that amends, delivers, issues, or renews an individual 11or group policy of accident and health insurance on or after 12the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 103rd General 13Assembly shall require a dental care provider to incur a fee to 14access and obtain payment or reimbursement for services 15provided. A dental plan carrier shall provide a dental care 16provider with 100% of the contracted amount of the payment or 17reimbursement. Fees incurred directly by a dental care 18provider from third parties related to transmitting an 19automated clearing house network claim, transaction 20management, data management, or portal services and other fees 21charged by third parties that are not in the control of the 22dental plan carrier shall not be prohibited by this Section.23(Source: P.A. 103-24, eff. 1-1-24.)   HB3476- 2 -LRB104 08938 BAB 18993 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.